District of Columbia statutes.
16-4604.04

Actions for abduction prevention measures.

(a)

A court on its own motion may order abduction prevention measures in a child-custody proceeding if the court finds that the evidence establishes a credible risk of abduction of the child.

(b)

A party to a child-custody determination or another individual or entity having a right under the law of this state or any other state to seek a child-custody determination for the child may file a petition seeking abduction prevention measures to protect the child under this subchapter.

(c)

The Attorney General for the District of Columbia may seek a warrant to take physical custody of a child under § 16-4604.09 or other appropriate prevention measures.

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-378, § 2(d), 56 DCR 1572
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 4 of the Uniform Child Abduction Prevention Act.